Washington statutes.
RCW 43.58.060

Oregon-Washington Columbia River boundary compact—Terms and provisions.

The terms and provisions of the compact referred to in RCW 43.58.050 are as follows:

INTERSTATE COMPACT DETERMINING

OREGON-WASHINGTON BOUNDARY ON THE

COLUMBIA RIVER

ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

The boundary between the states of Oregon and Washington along the course of the Columbia River has not been easy to ascertain because of changes in the main channel of the river with a result that a state of confusion and dispute exists and the enforcement and administration of the laws of the two states has been rendered difficult.

The purpose of this compact is to fix with precision by reference to stations of longitude and latitude the boundary between the states of Oregon and Washington from one marine league due west of the mouth of the Columbia River to the most easterly point at which the 46th parallel of North latitude crosses said river, at which point the river ceases to form the boundary between the two states.

ARTICLE II. DESCRIPTION

The boundary between the states of Oregon and Washington from one marine league due west of the mouth of the Columbia River to the point at which the last described point number (# 191) of the boundary as herein determined meets the 46th parallel of North latitude at 118° 59'10".12 of West longitude shall be as follows:

Beginning one marine league at sea off the mouth of the Columbia river at north latitude 46° 15'00".00; running thence due east to point number 1 of this description, which point is at north latitude 46° 15'00".00, west longitude 124° 05'00".00; thence from point number 1 continuing upstream in the channel of the Columbia river by a series of straight lines connecting the following numbered and described points in consecutive order.

Point

North

West

Description of

Number

Latitude

Longitude

Location

1

46°15'00".00

124°05'00".00

2

46°15'51".00

124°02'02".75

3

46°16'17".00

124°01'45".80

4

46°16'59".50

124°02'14".40

5

46°17'28".00

124°02'07".00

6

46°17'33".25

124°01'12".25

7

46°16'41".50

124°00'00".00

8

46°16'03".00

123°58'11".80

9

46°14'19".80

123°55'42".00

10

46°14'06".00

123°52'14".50

11

46°16'09".50

123°44'20".50

12

46°15'01".00

123°41'12".70

13

46°15'33".30

123°38'52".80

14

46°15'23".90

123°35'05".00

15

46°15'38".00

123°32'23".00

16

46°16'14".60

123°30'00".00

17

46°15'46".70

123°27'51".40

18

46°14'23".50

123°25'51".60

19

46°13'10".50

123°25'20".50

20

46°11'29".00

123°25'43".60

21

46°10'47".80

123°25'38".00

22

46°09'01".00

123°23'21".50

23

46°08'33".00

123°18'45".60

24

46°09'04".50

123°15'47".20

25

46°10'00".00

123°13'51".20

26

46°11'20".80

123°09'55".50

27

46°11'11".30

123°07'10".90

28

46°09'40".00

123°04'23".50

29

46°09'24".00

123°03'22".40

30

46°08'38".40

123°02'00".00

31

46°08'06".00

123°00'16".00

32

46°06'20".02

122°57'44".28

33

46°06'17".36

122°57'38".295

a point on the center line of the Longview Bridge at center of main span

34

46°06'14".71

122°57'32".31

35

46°05'02".70

122°54'11".00

36

46°03'37".50

122°52'59".50

37

46°01'53".50

122°52'35".50

38

46°00'52".25

122°51'17".20

39

45°58'52".00

122°50'11".80

40

45°57'40".00

122°48'46".80

41

45°55'57".00

122°48'18".00

42

45°54'47".00

122°48'36".75

43

45°53'05".00

122°47'48".30

44

45°52'06".00

122°47'01".50

45

45°50'40".00

122°47'04".50

46

45°49'31".20

122°47'41".00

47

45°48'37".00

122°47'40".00

48

45°46'51".00

122°46'06".30

49

45°45'34".20

122°45'37".00

50

45°44'04".70

122°45'32".00

51

45°42'05".00

122°46'16".00

52

45°40'50".80

122°46'24".00

53

45°39'26".75

122°45'46".00

54

45°38'40".00

122°44'13".00

55

45°38'17".00

122°42'47".50

56

45°37'35".37

122°41'35".14

57

45°37'29".47

122°41'23".855

a point on the center line of Northern Pacific Railroad Bridge across Columbia River, which point is at center of 3rd pier south of the draw span

58

45°37'26".52

122°41'18".215

59

45°37'07".85

122°40'33".42

60

45°37'05".938

122°40'26".939

a point on the center line of the west highway bridge crossing the Columbia River between Portland, Ore. and Vancouver, Wash., said point being 12.0 ft. south from the center of pier No. 6 of said bridge

61

45°37'05".62

122°40'25".86

a point on the center line of the east highway bridge crossing the Columbia River between Portland, Ore. and Vancouver, Wash., said point being 12.0 ft. south from the center of pier No. 6 of said bridge

62

45°37'03".71

122°40'19".38

63

45°36'34".00

122°38'27".00

64

45°36'29".80

122°36'21".30

65

45°36'20".00

122°35'20".00

66

45°35'47".90

122°32'48".00

67

45°35'23".50

122°31'24".20

68

45°35'01".00

122°29'30".00

69

45°34'42".80

122°28'20".50

70

45°34'03".00

122°27'09".30

71

45°33'49".00

122°26'15".80

72

45°34'03".30

122°24'36".50

73

45°34'29".50

122°23'25".80

74

45°34'33".40

122°22'44".00

75

45°34'10".00

122°21'04".00

76

45°32'55".20

122°19'49".00

77

45°32'38".00

122°17'43".70

78

45°32'38".80

122°15'56".70

79

45°33'03".25

122°14'24".50

80

45°33'55".00

122°11'58".50

81

45°34'37".00

122°10'54".00

82

45°35'03".00

122°08'25".50

83

45°34'53".40

122°06'40".00

84

45°35'00".00

122°06'02".00

85

45°36'35".00

122°02'35".00

86

45°36'53".80

122°01'11".50

87

45°36'58".00

122°00'08".50

88

45°37'23".00

121°58'54".50

89

45°37'59".00

121°57'42".80

90

45°38'37".50

121°57'16".50

91

45°38'42".00

121°57'01".80

92

45°38'40".35

121°56'37".34

93

45°38'40".13

121°56'22".57

a point at the intersection of the axis of Bonneville Dam and the center line of center pier of the spillway of said dam

94

45°38'39".82

121°56'01".46

95

45°39'17".00

121°54'25".00

96

45°39'43".85

121°53'58".48

a point on center line of bridge at Cascade Locks, known as "The Bridge of the Gods" and in the center of the main span of said bridge

97

45°39'44".81

121°53'58".16

98

45°39'45".77

121°53'57".84

99

45°40'15".00

121°54'02".00

100

45°41'36".80

121°51'57".00

101

45°42'24".75

121°48'36".00

102

45°41'39".00

121°44'02".00

103

45°41'42".00

121°42'22".00

104

45°42'19".00

121°40'02".00

105

45°42'17".50

121°37'48".50

106

45°43'36".00

121°31'54".30

107

45°43'15".275

121°29'52".445

108

45°43'07".02

121°29'36".615

a point on the center line of the Hood River Bridge at the center of the draw span of said bridge

109

45°43'04".075

121°29'30".96

110

45°42'05".20

121°27'41".80

111

45°41'39".25

121°25'22".00

112

45°41'35".00

121°24'02".00

113

45°42'11".50

121°22'17".00

114

45°42'18".00

121°20'11".50

115

45°42'00".00

121°18'40".00

116

45°41'13".30

121°17'10".00

117

45°40'40".50

121°14'52".00

118

45°40'17".00

121°12'52".50

119

45°39'00".00

121°11'57".00

120

45°37'47".00

121°11'38".40

121

45°37'00".25

121°11'43".00

122

45°36'23".80

121°10'57".00

123

45°36'22".50

121°10'00".00

124

45°36'29".175

121°08'39".84

125

45°36'40".89

121°08'22".135

a point on the center line of the Dallas Bridge across the Columbia River at the center of the main span of said bridge

126

45°36'43".94

121°08'17".53

127

45°36'35".69

121°07'50".34

128

45°36'58".44

121°07'16".41

129

45°37'06".095

121°06'57".58

130

45°37'14".85

121°07'02".75

a point on the axis of the Dalles Dam at Station 48+79 of the center line survey of said dam

131

45°37'23".97

121°07'08".14

132

45°38'53".13

121°05'01".25

133

45°39'09".54

121°03'47".80

134

45°39'04".04

121°01'57".51

135

45°39'12".08

121°00'22".28

136

45°38'54".66

120°58'56".33

137

45°38'55".91

120°58'49".52

a point on the center line of the Oregon Trunk Railroad Bridge and in the center of the 4th pier from the north end of said bridge

138

45°38'58".405

120°58'35".90

139

45°39'24".84

120°57'06".97

140

45°39'23".58

120°56'34".22

141

45°38'24".54

120°54'44".75

142

45°38'35".09

120°53'40".72

143

45°40'18".79

120°51'15".26

144

45°41'11".69

120°47'14".64

145

45°42'19".71

120°43'38".83

146

45°42'42".58

120°42'10".70

147

45°42'57".18

120°41'18".11

148

45°43'48".14

120°40'05".19

149

45°44'45".12

120°38'01".97

150

45°44'47".00

120°37'17".91

151

45°44'47".99

120°35'23".91

152

45°44'18".49

120°33'29".23

153

45°42'37".59

120°31'17".65

154

45°42'00".37

120°30'16".48

155

45°41'40".42

120°28'53".22

156

45°41'58".55

120°24'08".96

157

45°42'41".66

120°19'30".62

158

45°43'16".74

120°16'56".18

159

45°43'33".84

120°12'34".62

160

45°45'43".67

120°10'10".01

161

45°46'24".09

120°08'25".17

162

45°47'07".10

120°04'08".70

163

45°48'26".17

120°00'49".27

164

45°49'28".29

119°57'52".64

165

45°49'41".97

119°54'21".95

166

45°50'25".18

119°50'53".51

167

45°50'52".00

119°48'05".62

168

45°50'45".15

119°46'18".16

169

45°51'25".40

119°40'07".80

170

45°54'20".70

119°37'20".96

171

45°55'10".82

119°35'58".28

172

45°55'32".25

119°34'13".67

173

45°54'31".37

119°31'24".18

174

45°54'23".43

119°29'13".01

175

45°55'03".10

119°26'57".35

176

45°55'18".10

119°21'48".12

177

45°55'51".37

119°19'52".71

178

45°55'54".48

119°19'39".28

a point on the center line of the Umatilla Bridge at the center of the north main span of said bridge

179

45°55'59".59

119°19'17".20

180

45°56'10".26

119°17'47".60

a point on the axis of McNary Dam at the north face of the south nonoverflow section

181

45°56'15".24

119°17'05".76

182

45°56'24".05

119°15'21".40

183

45°55'58".60

119°13'28".22

184

45°55'40".97

119°11'39".82

185

45°55'40".26

119°10'05".04

186

45°55'58".55

119°07'30".72

187

45°56'34".25

119°05'32".00

188

45°57'31".28

119°03'37".36

189

45°58'09".33

119°01'33".95

190

45°58'45".73

119°00'27".12

191

46°00'00".00

118°59'10".12

ARTICLE III. RATIFICATION AND

EFFECTIVE DATE

This compact shall become operative when it has been ratified by the legislatures of the states of Oregon and Washington and approved by the Congress of the United States and the Constitutions of the states of Oregon and Washington have been amended to authorize the establishment of the boundary as herein provided.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.58.060. Prior: 1957 c 90 s 2.]